Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-104.6] Candidate advisory council
for the board of regents of the University of Hawaii. (a) The candidate
advisory council for the board of regents of the University of Hawaii shall
recruit, evaluate, and present to the governor qualified candidates for
nomination to a vacant seat on the board of regents. The candidate advisory
council shall be attached to the University of Hawaii for administrative
purposes.

(b) The candidate advisory council shall:

(1) Develop and implement a fair and independent
procedure for evaluating candidates to serve on the board of regents;

(2) Require candidates and members of their immediate
families to disclose any existing or anticipated contracts or financial
transactions with the University of Hawaii;

(3) Actively solicit and accept applications from
potential candidates;

(4) Evaluate candidates for the board of regents on
their background, experience, and potential for discharging the
responsibilities of a member of the board of regents, based upon the qualifications
imposed by the Hawaii State Constitution; and

(5) Present a list of at least three candidates to
the governor for nomination and appointment for each vacant seat on the board
of regents of the University of Hawaii.

(c) The candidate advisory council shall
initiate the recruitment and evaluation of candidates for each vacancy on the
board of regents within:

(1) Sixty days of a vacancy; or

(2) At least one hundred twenty days prior to the
expiration of a regent's term.

(d) To provide continuity for the board of
regents, the governor may recommend to the candidate advisory council the
reappointment of a member of the board of regents, subject to the advice and
consent of the senate.

(e) The candidate advisory council shall
consist of seven voting members to be appointed without regard to section 26-34
as follows:

(1) One member who shall be appointed by the
president of the senate;

(2) One member who shall be appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives; and

(3) Five members who shall be appointed by the
governor.

A member of the Association of Emeritus Regents
of the University of Hawaii, appointed by the chair of the Association of
Emeritus Regents of the University of Hawaii, shall serve as an ex officio,
nonvoting member of the candidate advisory council, for a term not to exceed
two years; provided that the appointment shall run concurrently with the term
of the appointing chair.

The president of the senate, speaker of the
house of representatives, and governor are encouraged to appoint full-time
students of the university, university faculty, university staff, or university
alumni to the candidate advisory council; provided that if a full-time student
is appointed to the candidate advisory council, the student shall have been
enrolled as a full-time student for at least three consecutive semesters and
shall serve for a term of two years.

(f) Voting members of the candidate advisory
council shall serve for the following terms:

(1) Those appointed by the president of the senate
and speaker of the house of representatives shall serve for a term of four
years; and

(2) Those appointed by the governor shall serve for a
term of four years; provided that such appointments shall run concurrently with
the term of the appointing governor.

(g) Appointees to the candidate advisory
council shall have a general understanding of the purposes of higher education,
the mission and strategic goals of the University of Hawaii system, and the
role and responsibilities of the board of regents. Appointees shall be
individuals who are widely viewed as having placed the broad public interest
ahead of special interests, are respected by the community, and are highly
qualified to recruit and evaluate candidates for the governor's consideration.

(h) Any member of the candidate advisory
council whose term has expired may continue in office as a holdover member
until a successor is appointed; provided that a holdover member shall not hold
office for more than six months following the expiration of the member's term
of office.

(i) A vacancy occurring in the membership of
the candidate advisory council during a term shall be filled for the remainder
of the unexpired term thereof by the appointing authority who appointed the
member who creates the vacancy.

(j) The candidate advisory council shall
operate in a wholly nonpartisan manner. No member of the candidate advisory
council shall run for or hold any elected office of the State or any of its
political subdivisions while serving on the candidate advisory council. A
member of the candidate advisory council shall resign from the candidate
advisory council prior to filing nomination papers for an elected office of the
State or any of its political subdivisions.

(k) The chairperson of the candidate advisory
council shall be elected by a majority of the voting members of the candidate
advisory council. A majority of the members to which the candidate advisory
council is entitled shall constitute a quorum to conduct business. The
concurrence of a majority of the voting members of the candidate advisory
council shall be necessary to make any action of the candidate advisory council
valid. The candidate advisory council shall meet annually and at other times
as necessary. The candidate advisory council shall be exempt from part I of
chapter 92.

(l) Members of the candidate advisory council
shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses,
including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. [L
2013, c 72, §2]

Note

Regents candidate advisory council; existing members to serve
until terms expire. L 2013, c 72, §5.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next